District of Columbia statutes.
47-2885.17

Peddling drugs prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale by peddling, or to offer for sale from house to house, or to offer for sale by public outcry, or by vending in the street, any drug, medicine, chemical, or controlled substance as defined in the District of Columbia Uniform Controlled Substances Act of 1981, or any compound or combination thereof, or any implement, appliance, or other agency for the treatment of disease, injury, or deformity; except, as may be otherwise authorized by law, no person shall throw, cast, deposit, drop, scatter, or leave, or cause to be thrown, cast, deposited, dropped, scattered, or left, any drug, medicine, chemical, or controlled substance as defined in the District of Columbia Uniform Controlled Substances Act of 1981, or any compound or combination thereof, upon any public highway or place, or, without the consent of the owner or occupant thereof, upon any premises in the District of Columbia. An offer for sale by peddling includes remaining or wandering about a public place and:

(1)

Repeatedly beckoning to, repeatedly stopping, repeatedly attempting to stop, or repeatedly attempting to engage passers-by in conversation;

(2)

Repeatedly stopping or attempting to stop motor vehicles; or

(3)

Repeatedly interfering with the free passage of other persons for the purpose of selling any controlled substance proscribed by the District of Columbia Uniform Controlled Substances Act of 1981.

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-98, § 18, 27 DCR 3528
Dec. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 4-57, § 4, 28 DCR 4652
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
This section is referenced in § 47-2885.17a.
1981 Ed., § 2-2017.
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.
The “District of Columbia Uniform Controlled Substances Act of 1981,” referred to throughout this section, is D.C. Law 4-29.